Utah statutes.
58-75-304.    Exemptions from licensure.
In addition to the exemptions from licensure set forth in Section 58-1-307,
the following persons may engage in the practice of genetic counseling subject
to the stated circumstances and limitations without being licensed under this
chapter:
(1)  an individual licensed as a physician and surgeon or osteopathic
physician and surgeon under Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, and Chapter
68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act; and
(2)  a commissioned physician or surgeon serving in the armed forces of the
United States or other federal agency.
